src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv34_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    kraft+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: kraft
    kraft+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: kraft
    kraft+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: kraft
    kraft+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: kraftar
    kraft+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: kreftir
    kraft+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: kreftum
    kraft+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: krefta
    kraft+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: kraftin
    kraft+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: kraftina
    kraft+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: kraftini
    kraft+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: kraftarinnar
    kraft+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: kreftirnar
    kraft+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: kreftunum
    kraft+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: kreftanna
